Delaware, session 153, HB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 303, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 303. Regulations, policies, and procedures. (e) The Board shall adopt regulations applicable to a member school regarding student athletes and awareness, recognition, and management of sudden cardiac arrest. The Board shall, through either regulation or policy adopted under regulation, do at least all of the following: (4) Hold a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation (âCPRâ) certification for each school-appointed head coach. The certification must include training on the use of an automated external defibrillator. (f) The Board shall adopt regulations relating to secondary and middle school interscholastic athletics that do at least all of the following: (1) Require all coaches to obtain and maintain certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), first aid, and the use of an automated external defibrillator (AED).â¯Training and certification in CPR and AED use must be consistent with national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. (2) Require that each school with an athletic department or program develop an athletic Emergency Action Plan (Plan) to respond to incidents of cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency during a school athletic practice or event.Â  The Plan must follow nationally recognized recommendations and be venue-specific, widely distributed, posted, and rehearsed annually. (3) Require that an AED be clearly marked and easily accessible in an unlocked location at each school athletic venue and event. The AED must be accessible during the school day and any school-sponsored athletic event or team practice in which students of the school are participating. The AED must be placed in accordance with nationally recognized guidelines focused on emergency cardiovascular care. (4) Require that AEDs be tested and maintained according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines. (5) Require notification is provided to the Office of Emergency Medical Services regarding the AED, the type acquired, and its location.